Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 75. Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act
§ 57-75-9.
Action by authority on behalf of state; cooperation of public agencies with authority; contracts by authority or public agency.

The authority is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state in submitting a siting proposal for any project eligible for assistance under this act. The authority is empowered to take all steps appropriate or necessary to effect the siting, development, and operation of the project within the state, including the negotiation of a fee-in-lieu. If the state is selected as the preferred site for the project, the authority is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state and to represent the state in the planning, financing, development, construction and operation of the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency. The authority may take affirmative steps to coordinate fully all aspects of the submission of a siting proposal for the project and, if the state is selected as the preferred site, to coordinate fully, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, the development of the project or any facility related to the project with private business, the United States government and other public agencies. All public agencies are encouraged to cooperate to the fullest extent possible to effectuate the duties of the authority; however, the development of the project or any facility related to the project by the authority may be done only with the concurrence of the affected public agency.

Contracts, by the authority or a public agency, including, but not limited to, design and construction contracts, for the acquisition, purchase, construction or installation of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 or any facility related to the project shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 if:

The authority finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or the particular nature of a project, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of this chapter to enter into such contracts on the basis of Section 31-7-13; and

The enterprise that is involved in the project concurs in such finding.

When the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met:

The requirements of Section 31-7-13 shall not apply to such contracts; and

The contracts may be entered into on the basis of negotiation.

The enterprise involved with the project may, upon approval of the authority, negotiate such contracts in the name of the authority.

The provisions of this subsection (2) shall not apply to contracts by the authority for excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 and such contracts may be entered into pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Contracts by the authority for excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of such contracts:

The authority shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the authority, but in no event less than one (1) business day, the date, time and place of a meeting with the authority to receive specifications on a request for proposals on excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1.

The authority shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications.

Following the meeting the authority shall, in its discretion, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract. The decision of the authority concerning the selection of the contractor shall be final.

Contracts by the authority or a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, wastewater or for public works for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of such contracts:

The authority or the public agency shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the authority or the public agency, but in no event less than one (1) nor more than five (5) calendar days, the date, time and place of a meeting with the authority or the public agency to receive specifications on the preparation of the site of the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii).

The authority or the public agency shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications.

Following the meeting the authority or the public agency shall, in its discretion, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract. The decision of the authority or the public agency concerning the selection of the contractor shall be final.

Contracts by a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for public works for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx) may be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of contracts:

The public agency shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the public agency, but in no event less than one (1) nor more than five (5) calendar days, the date, time and place of a meeting with the public agency to receive specifications on site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for public works related to the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx).

The public agency shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications.

Following the meeting the public agency shall, in its discretion, which discretion may include participation by an enterprise involved in the project, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract. The decision of the public agency concerning selection of the contractor shall be final.

Contracts, by the authority or a public agency, including, but not limited to, design and construction contracts, for the acquisition, purchase, construction or installation of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx) shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 if:

The authority finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or the particular nature of a project, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of this chapter to enter into such contracts on the basis of Section 31-7-13; and

The enterprise that is involved in the project concurs in such finding.

When the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met:

The requirements of Section 31-7-13 shall not apply to such contracts; and

The contracts may be entered into on the basis of negotiation with the authority or such public agency, and the authority or such public agency may, as part of such negotiations, further negotiate and require the level of participation by the enterprise involved in the project in the negotiation of such contracts.

The company shall make commercially reasonable efforts to place out for bid, such that Mississippi Contractors and Mississippi Disadvantaged Business Enterprises (“DBEs”) shall have an equal opportunity to respond to such bid, any contract by the company which (i) is subject to tax pursuant to Mississippi Code Section 27-65-21 (i.e., contracts for constructing, building, erecting, grading, excavating, etc.), and (ii) will be paid, or payment thereunder by the company will be reimbursed, using any portion of the grant proceeds or funds provided by the authority to the company in accordance with this agreement. In carrying out such efforts, in order to increase the pool of qualified DBE bidders, the company will request that successful prime contract bidders include in their response a commitment to (a) participate in and/or host forums that highlight subcontract bidding opportunities for DBEs; and (b) work with various trade associations and the Mississippi Development Authority to promote increased participation from DBEs. With respect to awarding any contract placed out for bid, the company shall be allowed to award such contract in the company’s sole discretion (e.g., based upon optimization of quality, cost and efficiency or on any other basis as the company may see fit). MDA agrees that it will offer to eligible contractor DBEs that have an opportunity to work on the project assistance through its Minority Surety Bond Guaranty Program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 5; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 43; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 2; Laws, 2007, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2; Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 45, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 301, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 405, § 2; Laws, 2013, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 57-75-11.
General powers and duties of authority.

The authority, in addition to any and all powers now or hereafter granted to it, is empowered and shall exercise discretion and the use of these powers depending on the circumstances of the project or projects:

To maintain an office at a place or places within the state.

To employ or contract with architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts and such other advisors, consultants and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix and pay their compensation.

To make such applications and enter into such contracts for financial assistance as may be appropriate under applicable federal or state law.

To apply for, accept and utilize grants, gifts and other funds or aid from any source for any purpose contemplated by the act, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this act, with the terms and conditions thereof.

(i) To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or in other manner, including quick-take eminent domain, or obtain options to acquire, and to own, maintain, use, operate and convey any and all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest or estate therein, within the project area, necessary for the project or any facility related to the project. The provisions of this paragraph that allow the acquisition of property by quick-take eminent domain shall be repealed by operation of law on July 1, 1994; and

Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (e), from and after November 6, 2000, to exercise the right of immediate possession pursuant to the provisions of Sections 11-27-81 through 11-27-89 for the purpose of acquiring land, property and/or rights-of-way in the county in which a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 is located, that are necessary for such project or any facility related to the project.

To acquire by purchase or lease any public lands and public property, including sixteenth section lands and lieu lands, within the project area, which are necessary for the project. Sixteenth section lands or lieu lands acquired under this act shall be deemed to be acquired for the purposes of industrial development thereon and such acquisition will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this act.

If the authority identifies any land owned by the state as being necessary, for the location or use of the project, or any facility related to the project, to recommend to the Legislature the conveyance of such land or any interest therein, as the Legislature deems appropriate.

To make or cause to be made such examinations and surveys as may be necessary to the planning, design, construction and operation of the project.

From and after the date of notification to the authority by the enterprise that the state has been finally selected as the site of the project, to acquire by condemnation and to own, maintain, use, operate and convey or otherwise dispose of any and all property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest or estate therein, within the project area, necessary for the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, and the exercise of the powers granted by this act, according to the procedures provided by Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, except as modified by this act.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (i), in acquiring lands by condemnation, the authority shall not acquire minerals or royalties in minerals unless a competent registered professional engineer shall have certified that the acquisition of such minerals and royalties in minerals is necessary for purposes of the project; provided that limestone, clay, chalk, sand and gravel shall not be considered as minerals for the purposes of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (i);

Unless minerals or royalties in minerals have been acquired by condemnation or otherwise, no person or persons owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production of minerals shall be prevented from exploring, developing, or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipelines and other means of transporting interests on any land or interest therein of the authority held or used for the purposes of this act; but any such activities shall be under such reasonable regulation by the authority as will adequately protect the project contemplated by this act as provided in paragraph (r) of this section; and

In acquiring lands by condemnation, including the exercise of immediate possession, for a project, as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, the authority may acquire minerals or royalties in minerals.

To negotiate the necessary relocation or rerouting of roads and highways, railroad, telephone and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, pipelines and related facilities, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided due compensation is paid to the owners thereof or agreement is had with such owners regarding the payment of the cost of such relocation, and to acquire by condemnation or otherwise easements or rights-of-way for such relocation or rerouting and to convey the same to the owners of the facilities being relocated or rerouted in connection with the purposes of this act.

To negotiate the necessary relocation of graves and cemeteries and to pay all reasonable costs thereof.

To perform or have performed any and all acts and make all payments necessary to comply with all applicable federal laws, rules or regulations including, but not limited to, the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (42 USCS 4601, 4602, 4621 to 4638, and 4651 to 4655) and relocation rules and regulations promulgated by any agency or department of the federal government.

To construct, extend, improve, maintain, and reconstruct, to cause to be constructed, extended, improved, maintained, and reconstructed, and to use and operate any and all components of the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, within the project area, necessary to the project and to the exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges granted the authority.

To incur or defray any designated portion of the cost of any component of the project or any facility related to the project acquired or constructed by any public agency.

(i) To lease, sell or convey any or all property acquired by the authority under the provisions of this act to the enterprise, its successors or assigns, and/or any entity for purposes in furtherance of economic development as determined by the authority, and in connection therewith to pay the costs of title search, perfection of title, title insurance and recording fees as may be required. The authority may provide in the instrument conveying such property a provision that such property shall revert to the authority if, as and when the property is declared by the transferee to be no longer needed.

To lease, sell, transfer or convey on any terms agreed upon by the authority any or all real and personal property, improvements, leases, funds and contractual obligations of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f) (vi) and conveyed to the State of Mississippi by a Quitclaim Deed from the United States of America dated February 23, 1996, filed of record at pages 511 to 524, Deed Book Number B179, Chancery Clerk’s Office, Tishomingo County, Mississippi, to any governmental authority located within the geographic boundaries of the county wherein such project exists upon agreement of such governmental authority to undertake and assume from the State of Mississippi all obligations and responsibilities in connection with ownership and operation of the project. Property leased, sold, transferred or otherwise conveyed by the authority under this paragraph (o) shall be used only for economic development purposes.

To enter into contracts with any person or public agency, including, but not limited to, contracts authorized by Section 57-75-17, in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized by this act upon such consideration as the authority and such person or public agency may agree. Any such contract may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any rule of law to the contrary, may be upon such terms as the parties thereto shall agree, and may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds, and all other obligations specified therein are paid or terminated. Any such contract shall be binding upon the parties thereto according to its terms. Such contracts may include an agreement to reimburse the enterprise, its successors and assigns for any assistance provided by the enterprise in the acquisition of real property for the project or any facility related to the project.

To establish and maintain reasonable rates and charges for the use of any facility within the project area owned or operated by the authority, and from time to time, to adjust such rates and to impose penalties for failure to pay such rates and charges when due.

To adopt and enforce with the concurrence of the affected public agency all necessary and reasonable rules and regulations to carry out and effectuate the implementation of the project and any land use plan or zoning classification adopted for the project area, including, but not limited to, rules, regulations, and restrictions concerning mining, construction, excavation or any other activity the occurrence of which may endanger the structure or operation of the project. Such rules may be enforced within the project area and without the project area as necessary to protect the structure and operation of the project. The authority is authorized to plan or replan, zone or rezone, and make exceptions to any regulations, whether local or state, with the concurrence of the affected public agency which are inconsistent with the design, planning, construction or operation of the project and facilities related to the project.

To plan, design, coordinate and implement measures and programs to mitigate impacts on the natural environment caused by the project or any facility related to the project.

To develop plans for technology transfer activities to ensure private sector conduits for exchange of information, technology and expertise related to the project to generate opportunities for commercial development within the state.

To consult with the State Department of Education and other public agencies for the purpose of improving public schools and curricula within the project area.

To consult with the State Board of Health and other public agencies for the purpose of improving medical centers, hospitals and public health centers in order to provide appropriate health care facilities within the project area.

To consult with the Office of Minority Business Enterprise Development and other public agencies for the purpose of developing plans for technical assistance and loan programs to maximize the economic impact related to the project for minority business enterprises within the State of Mississippi.

To deposit into the “Yellow Creek Project Area Fund” created pursuant to Section 57-75-31:

Any funds or aid received as authorized in this section for the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi), and

Any funds received from the sale or lease of property from the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi) pursuant to the powers exercised under this section.

To manage and develop the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi).

To promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act.

To negotiate a fee-in-lieu with the owners of the project.

To enter into contractual agreements to warrant any site work for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of such warranties shall not exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00).

To provide grant funds to an enterprise operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 in an amount not to exceed Thirty-nine Million Dollars ($39,000,000.00).

(i) To own surface water transmission lines constructed with the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this act and in connection therewith to purchase and provide water to any project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) and to certificated water providers; and

To lease such surface water transmission lines to a public agency or public utility to provide water to such project and to certificated water providers.

To provide grant funds to an enterprise operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(v) or, in connection with a facility related to such a project, for job training, recruiting and infrastructure.

To enter into negotiations with persons proposing projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xi) and execute acquisition options and conduct planning, design and environmental impact studies with regard to such project.

To establish such guidelines, rules and regulations as the authority may deem necessary and appropriate from time to time in its sole discretion, to promote the purposes of this act.

In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii):

To provide grant funds or loans to a public agency or an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(b);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and

To requisition money in the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Revolving Loan Fund in connection with such loans.

In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv):

To provide grant funds or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv); however, the aggregate amount of any such loans under this paragraph (ii) shall not exceed Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00) and the aggregate amount of any such grants under this paragraph (ii) shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and

Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, such loans shall be for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years as may be determined by the authority, shall bear interest at such rates as may be determined by the authority, shall, in the sole discretion of the authority, be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority.

In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii):

To provide grant funds of Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) to be used for real estate improvements and which may be disbursed as determined by the authority;

To provide loans to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) or make payments to a lender providing financing to the enterprise; subject to the following provisions:

1. Not more than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) may be loaned to such an enterprise for the purpose of defraying costs incurred by the enterprise for site preparation and real property improvements during the construction of the project in excess of budgeted costs; however, the amount of any such loan shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of such excess costs;

2. Not more than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) may be loaned to such an enterprise or paid to a lender providing financing to the enterprise for purposes determined appropriate by the authority, and the enterprise shall be obligated to repay the amount of the loan or payment plus any expenses incurred by the state as a result of the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(p); however, no such loan or payment may be made before the beginning of the fifth year after issuance by the enterprise of debt in like amount the proceeds of which are to be used in connection with the project;

To supervise the use of all such loan funds;

Loans under this paragraph (jj) may be for any term determined appropriate by the authority provided that the payments on any loan must be in an amount sufficient to pay the state’s debt service on bonds issued for the purpose of providing funds for such a loan; and

The repayment obligation of the enterprise for any loan or payment authorized under this paragraph (jj) shall, in the discretion of the authority, be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority.

In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or a facility related to such a project:

To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies, Itawamba Community College, Northeast Mississippi Community College, and/or East Mississippi Community College, public or private nonprofits or an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(s);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed; and

To enter into contractual agreements to warrant site preparation and availability for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi).

In connection with a project related to a Tier One supplier:

To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies, public or private nonprofits and Tier One suppliers for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(t);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed.

In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) or a facility related to such a project:

To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, fire protection, wastewater, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(u); and

To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed.

It is the policy of the authority and the authority is authorized to accommodate and support any enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii), 57-75-5(f)(xxi), 57-75-5(f)(xxii), 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), 57-75-5(f)(xxvii), 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), 57-75-5(f)(xxix) or 57-75-5(f)(xxx) or an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx), that wishes to have a program of diversity in contracting, and/or that wishes to do business with or cause its prime contractor to do business with Mississippi companies, including those companies that are small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. The term “socially and economically disadvantaged individuals” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 USCS 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto; except that women shall be presumed to be socially and economically disadvantaged individuals for the purposes of this paragraph.

To provide grant funds to an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) for reimbursement of costs incurred by such enterprise for infrastructure improvements in the initial phase of development of the project, upon dedication of such improvements to the appropriate public agency.

In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f) (xxiii):

To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f) (xxiii) for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads, public works, job training and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(v); and

To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed.

(i) To provide grant funds for the expansion of a publicly owned building for the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) for the purchase and/or relocation of equipment, or for any other purpose related to the project as approved by the authority; however, the aggregate amount of any such loans under this paragraph (qq) shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) and the aggregate amount of any such grants under this paragraph (qq) shall not exceed Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and

Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, such loans shall be for a term not to exceed ten (10) years as may be determined by the authority, shall bear a rate of interest to be determined by the authority, and shall be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority.

(i) To provide grant funds to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxv) for reimbursement of costs incurred by the enterprise in reconfiguring the manufacturing plant and for the purchase of equipment, or for any other purpose related to the project as approved by the authority;

To supervise the use of all such grant funds.

In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi):

To provide grant funds and/or loans to a public agency in an amount not to exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) for the construction of a publicly owned building to be leased by the enterprise owning or operating the project;

To provide loan guarantees in an amount not to exceed the total cost of the project for which financing is sought or Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00), whichever is less, for the purpose of encouraging the extension of conventional financing and the issuance of letters of credit to the enterprise owning or operating the project;

In connection with any loan guarantee made pursuant to this paragraph, to make payments to lenders providing financing to the enterprise owning or operating the project and the enterprise shall be obligated to repay the amount of the payment plus any expenses incurred by the state as a result of the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(y);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds, loan funds or payments; and

To require the enterprise owning or operating the project to provide security for the repayment obligation for any loan guarantee authorized under this paragraph in an amount and in a manner as may be determined by the authority.

In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii):

To provide loans to a public agency in an amount not to exceed Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) for the construction of a publicly owned building and acquisition of equipment to be leased by the enterprise owning or operating the project; and

To supervise the use of all such loan funds.

In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii):

To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchase and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(aa);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed.

In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix):

To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(bb);

To provide loans to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(bb);

To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed and/or loans so made; and

To the extent that the authority enters into any construction or similar contract for site preparation work or for the construction of any improvements on a project site, to assign or otherwise transfer to an enterprise or affiliate thereof that owns or operates such a project on such project site any and all contractual, express or implied warranties of any kind arising from such contract or work performed or materials purchased in connection therewith, and cause any such contract to contain terms and provisions designating such enterprise as a third-party beneficiary under the contract.

In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx):

To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for public infrastructure needs, site preparation, building improvements, purchase of launch systems, recruitment of employees to fill new full-time jobs, providing internal company training and train prospective, new and existing employees of the enterprise associated with the project, including training of company employees who will utilize such instruction to teach other prospective, new and existing employees of the company and other workforce expenses and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(cc); and

To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed.

(i) In addition to any other requirements or conditions under this chapter, the authority shall require that any application for assistance regarding a project under this chapter include, at a minimum:

1. A two-year business plan (which shall include pro forma balance sheets, income statements and monthly cash flow statements);

2. Financial statements or tax returns for the three (3) years immediately prior to the application (if the project is a new company or enterprise, personal financial statements or tax returns will be required);

3. Credit reports on all persons or entities with a twenty percent (20%) or greater interest in the project;

4. Data supporting the expertise of the project’s principals;

5. A cost-benefit analysis of the project performed by a state institution of higher learning or other entity selected by the authority; and

6. Any other information required by the authority.

The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that:

1. The applicable minimum requirements of this chapter and such other requirements as the authority considers proper shall be met; and

2. If the agreed upon commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided under this chapter as determined by the authority shall be repaid.

Where appropriate, in the discretion of the authority, the authority shall acquire a security interest in or other lien upon any applicable collateral.

The provisions of this paragraph (xx) shall not apply to a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 305, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 554 § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 326, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 513, § 3; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess., ch. 1, § 92; Laws, 2005, ch. 315, § 2; Laws, 2005, 4th Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 1; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 1; Laws, 2006, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 3; Laws, 2007, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 3; Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 45, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 302, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 303, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 301, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 405, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 2013, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 3; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 57-75-13.
Powers and duties of Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.

The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is hereby authorized to support the project by creating institutes and developing curricula of direct benefit to the enterprise. Upon notification to the authority by the enterprise that the state has been selected as the site of the project, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning may establish and create programs to enhance the project’s success.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).